Wisconsin, session 2025, AB644.
do enact as follows:AB644,11Section 1. 117.08 (6) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 117.08 (6) (a) 1. and 2amended to read:AB644,2,63117.08 (6) (a) 1. In Except as provided in subd. 2., in the school year in which 4the consolidation takes effect and in each of the subsequent 4 school years, $150 5multiplied by the number of pupils enrolled, as defined in s. 115.437 (1), in the 6school district in that school year.AB644,27Section 2. 117.08 (6) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB644,2,138117.08 (6) (a) 2. For a consolidation that takes effect in 2026, 2027, or 2028, in 9the school year in which the consolidation takes effect, $2,000 multiplied by the 10number of pupils enrolled, as defined in s. 115.437 (1), in the school district in that 11school year, and in each of the subsequent 4 school years, $150 multiplied by the 12number of pupils enrolled, as defined in s. 115.437 (1), in the school district in that 13school year.AB644,314Section 3. 117.09 (6) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 117.09 (6) (a) 1. and 15amended to read:AB644,2,1916117.09 (6) (a) 1. In Except as provided in subd. 2., in the school year in which 17the consolidation takes effect and in each of the subsequent 4 school years, $150 18multiplied by the number of pupils enrolled, as defined in s. 115.437 (1), in the 19school district in that school year.AB644,420Section 4. 117.09 (6) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB644,3,61117.09 (6) (a) 2. For a consolidation that takes effect in 2026, 2027, or 2028, in 2the school year in which the consolidation takes effect, $2,000 multiplied by the 3number of pupils enrolled, as defined in s. 115.437 (1), in the school district in that 4school year, and in each of the subsequent 4 school years, $150 multiplied by the 5number of pupils enrolled, as defined in s. 115.437 (1), in the school district in that 6school year.AB644,3,77